Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1015.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Virtual Currency Kiosk Regulation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Armored car carrier." A corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or foreign entity qualified to do business in this Commonwealth that is used by a virtual currency kiosk operator to transport fiat currency to or from a virtual currency kiosk."Blockchain." A distributed digital ledger or database which is chronological, consensus-based, decentralized and mathematically verified in nature."Blockchain analytics." A software service that uses data from various virtual currencies and their applicable blockchains to provide a risk rating specific to digital wallet addresses from users of virtual currency kiosks."Department." The Department of Banking and Securities of the Commonwealth."Digital wallet." Hardware or software that enables individuals to store and use virtual currency.20250SB1015PN1172 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Digital wallet address." An alphanumeric identifier representing a destination on a blockchain for a virtual currency transfer that is associated with a digital wallet."Fiat currency." A medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the Federal Government as part of its currency and is not backed by a commodity."NMLS." The Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries."Virtual currency." As follows:(1) The term includes a digital representation of value that:(i) Is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account or store of value.(ii) Is not money, unless the virtual currency was adopted or authorized by a domestic or international government as a medium of exchange, whether denominated in cash.(2) The term does not include:(i) A transaction in which a merchant grants, as part of an affinity or rewards program, value that cannot be taken from or exchanged with the merchant for money, bank credit or virtual currency.(ii) A digital representation of value issued by or on behalf of a publisher and used solely within an online game, game platform or family of games sold by the same publisher or offered on the same game platform.20250SB1015PN1172 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Virtual currency kiosk." An electronic terminal of the virtual currency kiosk operator that enables the owner or operator to facilitate the exchange of fiat currency for virtual currency or virtual currency for fiat currency or other virtual currency, including, but not limited to:(1) connecting directly to a separate virtual currency exchange that performs the actual virtual currency transmission; or(2) drawing upon the virtual currency in the possession of the owner or operator of the electronic terminal."Virtual currency kiosk operator." A corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or foreign entity qualified to do business in this Commonwealth which operates a virtual currency kiosk within this Commonwealth.Section 3. Confidentiality.(a) Restricted use.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, all information or reports obtained by the department from a virtual currency kiosk operator, and all information contained in or related to an examination, investigation, operating report or condition report prepared by, on behalf of or for the use of the department, are confidential.(b) Information availability.--Information contained in the records of the department that is not confidential and may be available to the public either on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, upon receipt by the department of a written request or in NMLS shall include:(1) the name, business address, telephone number and unique identifier of a virtual currency kiosk operator;(2) the business address of a virtual currency kiosk operator's registered agent for service; and20250SB1015PN1172 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) copies of any final orders of the department relating to any violation of this act or regulations implementing this act.Section 4. Disclosures of material risks.As part of establishing a relationship with a customer, and prior to entering into an initial transaction for, on behalf of or with the customer, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall disclose in clear, conspicuous and legible writing in the English language, whether in accessible terms of service or elsewhere, all material risks associated with its products, services and activities and virtual currency generally, including disclosures substantially similar to the following:(1) Virtual currency is not legal tender, is not backed by the government and accounts and value balances are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or Securities Investor Protection Corporation protections.(2) Legislative and regulatory changes or actions at the Federal, State or international level may adversely affect the use, transfer, exchange and value of virtual currency.(3) Transactions in virtual currency may be irreversible, and, accordingly, losses due to fraudulent or accidental transactions may not be recoverable.(4) Some virtual currency transactions shall be deemed to be made when recorded on a public ledger, which is not necessarily the date or time that the customer initiates the transaction.(5) The value of virtual currency may be derived from the continued willingness of market participants to exchange fiat currency for virtual currency, which may result in the potential for permanent and total loss of value of a 20250SB1015PN1172 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 particular virtual currency should the market for that virtual currency disappear.(6) There is no assurance that a person who accepts a virtual currency as payment today will continue to do so in the future.(7) The volatility and unpredictability of the price of virtual currency may result in significant loss over a short period of time.(8) The nature of virtual currency may lead to an increased risk of fraud or cyber attack.(9) The nature of virtual currency means that any technological difficulties experienced by the virtual currency kiosk operator may prevent the access or use of a customer's virtual currency.(10) Any bond or trust account maintained by the virtual currency kiosk operator for the benefit of its customers may not be sufficient to cover all losses incurred by customers.Section 5. Disclosure of general terms and conditions.When opening an account for a new customer, and prior to entering into an initial transaction for, on behalf of or with the customer, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall disclose in clear, conspicuous and legible writing in the English language, whether in accessible terms of service or elsewhere, all relevant terms and conditions associated with its products, services and activities and virtual currency generally, including disclosures substantially similar to the following:(1) The customer's liability for unauthorized virtual currency transactions.(2) Under what circumstances the virtual currency kiosk operator may, absent a court or government order, disclose 20250SB1015PN1172 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information concerning the customer's account to third parties.(3) The customer's right to receive periodic account statements and valuations from the virtual currency kiosk operator.(4) The customer's right to receive a receipt, trade ticket or other evidence of a transaction.(5) The customer's right to prior notice of a change in the virtual currency kiosk operator's rules or policies.(6) Other disclosures as are customarily given in connection with the opening of customer accounts.Section 6. Warning disclosure.Prior to entering into a virtual currency transaction with a customer, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall ensure that a warning is disclosed to a customer substantially similar to the following:WARNING: CONSUMER FRAUD OFTEN STARTS WITH CONTACT FROM A STRANGER WHO IS INITIATING A DISHONEST SCHEME. I UNDERSTAND THAT BY TRANSACTING I AGREE TO THE FOLLOWING:I confirm that I am purchasing cryptocurrency with my own funds or am selling cryptocurrency that belongs to me. I have not been asked to purchase cryptocurrency by anyone else, including this company or my employer.I confirm that I am using a digital wallet that I own or have direct control over.I understand that the purchase and sale of cryptocurrency is a final irreversible and nonrefundable transaction.If someone has instructed you to use this kiosk in relation to urgent payments such as: a utility bill, a 20250SB1015PN1172 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 law enforcement request, Social Security or IRS payment or to pay for someone else's medical bills, travel expenses or bail, it may be a scam and you should not proceed with the transaction. If you have questions, please call a customer services representative.If you suspect that you are being targeted in a cryptocurrency scam, please contact law enforcement.Section 7. Receipts.Upon completion of any virtual currency kiosk transaction, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide to a customer a digital or physical receipt containing the following information:(1) The name and contact information of the virtual currency kiosk operator, including a telephone number established by the virtual currency kiosk operator to answer questions and register complaints.(2) The type, value, date and precise time of the transaction.(3) The fee charged.(4) The exchange rate, if applicable.(5) A statement of the liability of the virtual currency kiosk operator for nondelivery or delayed delivery.(6) A statement of the refund policy of the virtual currency kiosk operator.Section 8. Blockchain analytics.A virtual currency kiosk operator shall use blockchain analytics software to assist in the prevention of sending purchased virtual currency from a virtual currency kiosk operator to a digital wallet known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of a transaction. The department 20250SB1015PN1172 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may request evidence from any virtual currency kiosk operator of current use of blockchain analytics.Section 9. Customer service.A virtual currency kiosk operator performing business in this Commonwealth shall provide live 24-hour customer service. The customer service toll-free telephone number shall be displayed on the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk screens.Section 10. Anti-fraud policy.A virtual currency kiosk operator shall take reasonable steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and maintaining a written anti-fraud policy. The anti-fraud policy shall include:(1) The identification and assessment of fraud-related risk areas.(2) Procedures and controls to protect against identified risks.(3) Allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks.(4) Procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of the anti-fraud procedures, controls and monitoring mechanisms.Section 11. Financial Exploitation of Elder and Vulnerable Adults Policy.(a) Written policy.--A virtual currency kiosk operator shall maintain, implement and enforce a written Financial Exploitation of Elder and Vulnerable Adults Policy. The policy shall be reviewed and approved by the virtual currency kiosk operator's board of directors or an equivalent governing body of the virtual currency kiosk operator.(b) At-risk individuals.--The Financial Exploitation of 20250SB1015PN1172 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Elder and Vulnerable Adults Policy shall identify at minimum individuals who are at risk of financial exploitation based on age or mental capacity and steps to prevent exploitation.Section 12. Compliance policies.(a) Compliance.--A virtual currency kiosk operator shall comply with the provisions of this act, any lawful order, rule or regulation made or issued under the provisions of this act and all applicable Federal and State laws, rules and regulations.(b) Written policies.--A virtual currency kiosk operator shall maintain, implement and enforce written compliance policies and procedures. The policies and procedures shall be reviewed and approved by the virtual currency kiosk operator's board of directors or an equivalent governing body of the virtual currency kiosk operator.(c) Records.--A virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide the department with records that the department may reasonably require to ensure compliance with this act.Section 13. Compliance officer.(a) Requirements.--A virtual currency kiosk operator shall designate and employ a compliance officer with the following requirements:(1) The individual must be qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this act and all other applicable Federal and State laws, rules and regulations.(2) The individual must be employed full time by the virtual currency kiosk operator.(3) The designated compliance officer cannot be any individual who owns more than 20% of the virtual currency kiosk operator by whom the individual is employed.20250SB1015PN1172 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Responsibilities.--Compliance responsibilities required under Federal and State laws, rules and regulations shall be completed by full-time employees of the virtual currency kiosk operator.Section 14. Consumer protection officer.A virtual currency kiosk operator shall designate and employ a consumer protection officer with each of the following requirements:(1) The individual must be qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this act and all other applicable Federal and State laws, rules and regulations.(2) The individual must be employed full time by the virtual currency kiosk operator.(3) The designated consumer protection officer cannot be an individual who owns more than 20% of the virtual currency kiosk operator by whom the individual is employed.Section 15. Reporting virtual currency kiosk locations.(a) Locations.--A virtual currency kiosk operator shall submit a report of the location of each virtual currency kiosk located within this Commonwealth within 45 days of the end of the calendar quarter. The department shall formulate a system for virtual currency kiosk operators to submit the locations that is consistent with the requirements of this section.(b) Content of report.--The location report shall include, at a minimum, the following regarding the location of a virtual currency kiosk:(1) Company legal name.(2) Any fictitious or trade name.(3) Physical address.(4) Start date of operation of the virtual currency 20250SB1015PN1172 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 kiosk at the location.(5) End date of operation of the virtual currency kiosk at the location, if applicable.Section 16. Money transmitter license.(a) Requirement.--A virtual currency kiosk operator that owns, operates, solicits, markets, advertises or facilitates virtual currency kiosks in this Commonwealth shall be deemed to be engaged in money transmission and require licensure under this act and the act of September 2, 1965 (P.L.490, No.249), known as the Money Transmission and Virtual Currency Transmission Business Licensing Law.(b) Application.--An unlicensed virtual currency kiosk operator shall apply for a money transmitter license within 60 days after the effective date of this subsection. A virtual currency kiosk operator that applies within this time period shall be allowed to continue operations while the department reviews the virtual currency kiosk operator's application. If a virtual currency kiosk operator's application is denied, the virtual currency kiosk operator shall cease operations until granted a money transmitter license.Section 17. Armored car carrier.An armored car carrier shall only engage in business with a virtual currency kiosk operator that has obtained proper licensure or registration in this Commonwealth or that applied for proper licensure in this Commonwealth prior to the effective date of this section.Section 18. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1015PN1172 - 12 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728